Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5515
Taxes; form.

Every industrial insured shall annually, on or before February 15, pay to the department a tax of three percent on the total gross amount of insurance premiums for policies procured through nonadmitted insurers. Every industrial insured shall pay the fire insurance tax prescribed in section 81-523. The department shall prescribe a form for an industrial insured tax filing.

Laws 2007, LB117, § 24.